Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.080

Malicious mischief in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree if he or she knowingly and maliciously:

(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars;

(b) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public, by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication; or

(c) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by, without lawful authority, physically damaging, destroying, or removing an official ballot deposit box or ballot drop box or, without lawful authority, damaging, destroying, removing, or tampering with the contents thereof.

(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2017 c 283 s 2; 2009 c 431 s 5; 1994 c 261 s 17; 1979 c 145 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.080.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.

Action by owner of stolen livestock: RCW 4.24.320.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.